Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6863HV (1) 91 ms/md H.F. 2789 Section 1. Section 427.1, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. For purposes of this section, âreligious 3 institution or societyâ includes but is not limited to any of 4 the following: 5 (1) A church or other house of worship. 6 (2) A convention or association of churches or other houses 7 of worship. 8 (3) A religious nonprofit corporation organized under 9 chapter 504 primarily for religious purposes regardless of 10 whether it is integrated or affiliated with a church or other 11 house of worship. 12 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to assessment years 13 beginning on or after January 1, 2027. 14